Florida, session 2026, SB992.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 48 49 Section 1.âSection 220.197, Florida Statutes, is created to 50 read: 51 220.197âResilient building tax credit program.â 52 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âresilient buildingâ 53 means any of the following: 54 (a)âA building that has a Leadership in Energy and 55 Environmental Design (LEED) certificate of silver, gold, or 56 platinum in building design and construction (BD+C), which 57 certificate meets the requirements for the LEED resilience 58 pathway. 59 (b)âA building that has a LEED certificate of silver, gold, 60 or platinum in operations and maintenance (O+M), which 61 certificate meets the requirements for the LEED resilience 62 pathway. 63 (2)âFor taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 64 2027, the owner of a resilient building is eligible to receive a 65 credit against the tax imposed by this chapter as specified in 66 subsection (3). A resilient building may qualify for the tax 67 credit under this section only once. 68 (a)âTo claim a credit under this section, a building owner 69 must file an application for a tax credit with the Department of 70 Business and Professional Regulation on a form prescribed by the 71 Department of Business and Professional Regulation no later than 72 March 1 of the year immediately following the year of the 73 buildingâs LEED certification. The Department of Business and 74 Professional Regulation may allow applications to be filed 75 electronically. The building owner must verify the application 76 under oath, under the penalty of perjury, and the application 77 must contain all of the following: 78 1.âDocumentation evidencing the type of LEED certification 79 that was granted for the building that is the subject of the 80 application. 81 2.âThe date on which LEED certification was granted. 82 3.âA statement by the building owner that, for the purpose 83 of research, the resilient buildingâs energy use information 84 will be reported every year of the 5-year credit period to the 85 Department of Business and Professional Regulation using the 86 ENERGY STAR Portfolio Manager. The Department of Business and 87 Professional Regulation may publish the reported energy use 88 information but may disclose such data only in the aggregate or 89 individually without identifying information. 90 4.âOther information the Department of Business and 91 Professional Regulation deems necessary to make a proper review 92 and determine eligibility. 93 (b)âNo later than 30 days after a building owner submits a 94 completed application for the tax credit, the Department of 95 Business and Professional Regulation shall do one of the 96 following: 97 1.âIf the building owner is not eligible for a tax credit, 98 notify the building owner in writing of the reasons the building 99 owner is not entitled to a tax credit. 100 2.âIf the building owner is eligible for a tax credit, 101 issue a letter to the building owner which includes the name of 102 the taxpayer, the address of the resilient building, the amount 103 of the tax credit as specified in subsection (3), and the tax 104 years for which the building owner is eligible for the tax 105 credit. The building owner must attach the letter from the 106 Department of Business and Professional Regulation to the tax 107 return on which the credit is claimed. 108 (c)âA building owner may file only one application with the 109 Department of Business and Professional Regulation for each 110 resilient building, except that a building owner may file a 111 subsequent application if the building ownerâs first application 112 was denied or withdrawn because of errors or omissions in the 113 application and the building owner corrected such errors or 114 omissions in the subsequent application. 115 (3)âIf the resilient building that is the subject of an 116 application filed under subsection (2) has: 117 (a)âA gold or silver BD+C LEED certification that fulfills 118 the LEED resilience pathway, the building owner may receive a 119 tax credit equal to 50 cents per square foot of the building 120 every year for 5 years. 121 (b)âA platinum BD+C LEED certification that fulfills the 122 LEED resilience pathway, the building owner may receive a tax 123 credit equal to $1 per square foot of the building every year 124 for 5 years. 125 (c)âA gold or silver O+M LEED certification that fulfills 126 the LEED resilience pathway, the building owner may receive a 127 tax credit equal to $1 per square foot of the building every 128 year for 5 years. 129 (d)âA platinum O+M LEED certification that fulfills the 130 LEED resilience pathway, the building owner may receive a tax 131 credit equal to $2 per square foot of the building every year 132 for 5 years. 133 (4)(a)âIf the credit granted under this section is not 134 fully used in any one taxable year because of insufficient tax 135 liability on the part of the building owner, or because the 136 building owner is not subject to tax under this chapter, the 137 unused amount may be carried forward for a period not to exceed 138 5 taxable years or may be transferred in accordance with 139 paragraph (b). The carryover or transferred credit may be used 140 in the year approved or any of the 5 subsequent taxable years 141 when the tax imposed by this chapter for that taxable year 142 exceeds the credit for which the building owner or transferee 143 under paragraph (b) is eligible in that taxable year under this 144 subsection and after applying the other credits and unused 145 carryovers in the order provided by s. 220.02(8). 146 (b)1.âThe credit under this section may be transferred, in 147 whole or in part: 148 a.âBy written agreement to a taxpayer subject to the tax 149 under this chapter; and 150 b.âAt any time after receipt of the letter of eligibility 151 specified in subparagraph (2)(b)2., or during the 5 taxable 152 years following the taxable year the credit was originally 153 earned by the building owner. 154 2.âThe written agreement required for transfer under this 155 paragraph must: 156 a.âBe filed jointly by the building owner and the 157 transferee with the department within 30 days after the 158 transfer, in accordance with rules adopted by the department; 159 and 160 b.âContain all of the following information: 161 (I)âThe name, address, and taxpayer identification number 162 for the building owner and the transferee. 163 (II)âThe amount of the credit being transferred. 164 (III)âThe taxable year in which the credit was originally 165 earned by the building owner. 166 (IV)âThe remaining taxable years for which the credit may 167 be claimed. 168 (5)âIf the recipient of the credit granted under this 169 section in any year fails to provide the energy use information 170 required under subparagraph (2)(a)3., the Department of Business 171 and Professional Regulation must rescind the authorization for 172 the credit. Within 10 days after the date on which the building 173 owner was required to report the information, the Department of 174 Business and Professional Regulation shall send a notice 175 informing the recipient of the credit of the Department of 176 Business and Professional Regulationâs intent to rescind the 177 credit. If the recipient does not provide the information within 178 20 days after the date the notice is sent, the Department of 179 Business and Professional Regulation must notify the department 180 of the rescindment of the recipientâs tax credit, and the 181 department may not allow the credit to be taken. 182 (6)âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation 183 may not authorize tax credits under this section which exceed 184 $50 million in any taxable year and shall authorize tax credits 185 on a first-come, first-served basis. The department must defer 186 any remaining eligible applications for consideration in the 187 next taxable year. 188 (7)âThe department and the Department of Business and 189 Professional Regulation shall adopt rules to implement this 190 section. 191 Section 2.âSection 553.972, Florida Statutes, is created to 192 read: 193 553.972âFlorida Resilient Building Advisory Council.â 194 (1)âThe Florida Resilient Building Advisory Council, an 195 advisory council as defined in s. 20.03(7), is created adjunct 196 to the department. The purpose of the advisory council is to do 197 all of the following: 198 (a)âProvide the department and the Legislature with 199 recommendations on policies to foster and enhance resilient 200 buildings and hurricane resiliency in this state. 201 (b)âBeginning in 2032 and every 4 years thereafter, review 202 the implementation of s. 220.197 to evaluate its effectiveness 203 in promoting resilient building practices in this state and 204 provide recommendations to the department and the Legislature 205 regarding any needed statutory or administrative changes. 206 (2)âThe department shall post on its website any proposed 207 policies from the advisory council. 208 (3)âThe advisory council shall be composed of the following 209 members, who shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing 210 authorities: 211 (a)âA representative of the Florida State University, who 212 shall serve as co-chair and be appointed by the Governor. 213 (b)âA representative of the Florida Gulf Coast University 214 U.A. Whitaker College of Engineering, who shall serve as co 215 chair and be appointed by the President of the Senate. 216 (c)âA representative of the University of Florida College 217 of Design, Construction, and Planningâs Sustainability and the 218 Built Environment program, who shall serve as co-chair and be 219 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 220 (d)âA representative of the University of Miami, who shall 221 be appointed by the President of the Senate. 222 (e)âA representative of the University of South Florida, 223 who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of 224 Representatives. 225 (f)âA representative of the Florida International 226 University International Hurricane Research Center, who shall be 227 appointed by the President of the Senate. 228 (g)âA representative of the University of Central Florida, 229 who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of 230 Representatives. 231 (h)âFive additional members appointed by the Governor. 232 (i)âFive additional members appointed by the President of 233 the Senate. 234 (j)âFive additional members appointed by the Speaker of the 235 House of Representatives. 236 237 The members appointed must have specialized knowledge regarding 238 resilient building design and construction, resilient building 239 operations and maintenance, policy innovation and incentives, 240 and building and community challenges. 241 (4)âWhen appointing members under paragraphs (3)(h), (i), 242 and (j), the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 243 Speaker of the House of Representatives, respectively, shall 244 make reasonable efforts to appoint persons to the advisory 245 council who include the following: 246 (a)âFive members who are representatives of local 247 government. 248 (b)âTwo members who are representatives of building codes 249 and standards organizations. 250 (c)âTwo members who are representatives of sustainable or 251 resilient building certification organizations. 252 (d)âOne member who is an architect licensed in this state. 253 (e)âOne member who is an engineer licensed in this state. 254 (f)âOne member who is a representative of the commercial 255 and residential property insurance industry. 256 (g)âTwo members who have expertise in renewable energy and 257 energy storage systems. 258 (h)âOne member who has expertise in building-power grid 259 integration. 260 (5)âAdvisory council members must be appointed no later 261 than August 1, 2026. Members shall serve 4-year terms, except 262 that the initial terms must be staggered. The Governor shall 263 initially appoint two members for a term of 4 years, two members 264 for a term of 3 years, and two members for a term of 2 years. 265 The President of the Senate shall initially appoint three 266 members for a term of 4 years, three members for a term of 3 267 years, and two members for a term of 2 years. The Speaker of the 268 House of Representatives shall initially appoint three members 269 for a term of 4 years, two members for a term of 3 years, and 270 two members for a term of 2 years. Members of the advisory 271 council shall serve without compensation but are entitled to 272 reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses pursuant to s. 273 112.061. 274 (6)âThe advisory council shall meet at the call of the co 275 chairs at a time and location in this state designated by the 276 co-chairs, provided that the first meeting must occur no later 277 than November 1, 2026, and that subsequent meetings must occur 278 no less than semiannually thereafter. 279 (7)âThe department shall provide staffing and 280 administrative assistance to the advisory council in performing 281 its duties. 282 (8)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is 283 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 284 through reenactment by the Legislature. 285 Section 3.âParagraph (cc) is added to subsection (8) of 286 section 213.053, Florida Statutes, to read: 287 213.053âConfidentiality and information sharing.â 288 (8)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 289 the department may provide: 290 (cc)âInformation related to the resilient building tax 291 credit program under s. 220.197 to the Department of Business 292 and Professional Regulation in the conduct of its official 293 business. 294 295 Disclosure of information under this subsection shall be 296 pursuant to a written agreement between the executive director 297 and the agency. Such agencies, governmental or nongovernmental, 298 shall be bound by the same requirements of confidentiality as 299 the Department of Revenue. Breach of confidentiality is a 300 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided by s. 301 775.082 or s. 775.083. 302 Section 4.âSubsection (8) of section 220.02, Florida 303 Statutes, is amended to read: 304 220.02âLegislative intent.â 305 (8)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that credits 306 against either the corporate income tax or the franchise tax be 307 applied in the following order: those enumerated in s. 631.828, 308 those enumerated in s. 220.191, those enumerated in s. 220.181, 309 those enumerated in s. 220.183, those enumerated in s. 220.182, 310 those enumerated in s. 220.1895, those enumerated in s. 220.195, 311 those enumerated in s. 220.184, those enumerated in s. 220.186, 312 those enumerated in s. 220.1845, those enumerated in s. 220.19, 313 those enumerated in s. 220.185, those enumerated in s. 220.1875, 314 those enumerated in s. 220.1876, those enumerated in s. 315 220.1877, those enumerated in s. 220.18775, those enumerated in 316 s. 220.1878, those enumerated in s. 288.062, those enumerated in 317 former s. 288.9916, those enumerated in former s. 220.1899, 318 those enumerated in former s. 220.194, those enumerated in s. 319 220.196, those enumerated in s. 220.198, those enumerated in s. 320 220.1915, those enumerated in s. 220.199, those enumerated in s. 321 220.1991, and those enumerated in s. 220.1992, and those 322 enumerated in s. 220.197. 323 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 324 220.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 325 220.13ââAdjusted federal incomeâ defined.â 326 (1)âThe term âadjusted federal incomeâ means an amount 327 equal to the taxpayerâs taxable income as defined in subsection 328 (2), or such taxable income of more than one taxpayer as 329 provided in s. 220.131, for the taxable year, adjusted as 330 follows: 331 (a)âAdditions.âThere shall be added to such taxable income: 332 1.a.âThe amount of any tax upon or measured by income, 333 excluding taxes based on gross receipts or revenues, paid or 334 accrued as a liability to the District of Columbia or any state 335 of the United States which is deductible from gross income in 336 the computation of taxable income for the taxable year. 337 b.âNotwithstanding sub-subparagraph a., if a credit taken 338 under s. 220.1875, s. 220.1876, s. 220.1877, or s. 220.1878 is 339 added to taxable income in a previous taxable year under 340 subparagraph 11. and is taken as a deduction for federal tax 341 purposes in the current taxable year, the amount of the 342 deduction allowed shall not be added to taxable income in the 343 current year. The exception in this sub-subparagraph is intended 344 to ensure that the credit under s. 220.1875, s. 220.1876, s. 345 220.1877, or s. 220.1878 is added in the applicable taxable year 346 and does not result in a duplicate addition in a subsequent 347 year. 348 2.âThe amount of interest which is excluded from taxable 349 income under s. 103(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or any other 350 federal law, less the associated expenses disallowed in the 351 computation of taxable income under s. 265 of the Internal 352 Revenue Code or any other law, excluding 60 percent of any 353 amounts included in alternative minimum taxable income, as 354 defined in s. 55(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 355 taxpayer pays tax under s. 220.11(3). 356 3.âIn the case of a regulated investment company or real 357 estate investment trust, an amount equal to the excess of the 358 net long-term capital gain for the taxable year over the amount 359 of the capital gain dividends attributable to the taxable year. 360 4.âThat portion of the wages or salaries paid or incurred 361 for the taxable year which is equal to the amount of the credit 362 allowable for the taxable year under s. 220.181. This 363 subparagraph shall expire on the date specified in s. 290.016 364 for the expiration of the Florida Enterprise Zone Act. 365 5.âThat portion of the ad valorem school taxes paid or 366 incurred for the taxable year which is equal to the amount of 367 the credit allowable for the taxable year under s. 220.182. This 368 subparagraph shall expire on the date specified in s. 290.016 369 for the expiration of the Florida Enterprise Zone Act. 370 6.âThe amount taken as a credit under s. 220.195 which is 371 deductible from gross income in the computation of taxable 372 income for the taxable year. 373 7.âThat portion of assessments to fund a guaranty 374 association incurred for the taxable year which is equal to the 375 amount of the credit allowable for the taxable year. 376 8.âIn the case of a nonprofit corporation which holds a 377 pari-mutuel permit and which is exempt from federal income tax 378 as a farmersâ cooperative, an amount equal to the excess of the 379 gross income attributable to the pari-mutuel operations over the 380 attributable expenses for the taxable year. 381 9.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year under 382 s. 220.1895. 383 10.âUp to nine percent of the eligible basis of any 384 designated project which is equal to the credit allowable for 385 the taxable year under s. 220.185. 386 11.âAny amount taken as a credit for the taxable year under 387 s. 220.1875, s. 220.1876, s. 220.1877, or s. 220.1878. The 388 addition in this subparagraph is intended to ensure that the 389 same amount is not allowed for the tax purposes of this state as 390 both a deduction from income and a credit against the tax. This 391 addition is not intended to result in adding the same expense 392 back to income more than once. 393 12.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year under 394 s. 220.196. The addition in this subparagraph is intended to 395 ensure that the same amount is not allowed for the tax purposes 396 of this state as both a deduction from income and a credit 397 against the tax. The addition is not intended to result in 398 adding the same expense back to income more than once. 399 13.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 400 pursuant to s. 220.198. 401 14.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 402 pursuant to s. 220.1915. 403 15.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 404 pursuant to s. 220.199. 405 16.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 406 pursuant to s. 220.1991. 407 17.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 408 pursuant to s. 220.197. 409 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.